Utah statutes.
73-3b-303.   Modification of recharge or recovery permits.

(1)  The state engineer, on his own initiative or at the request of any person holding a recharge or recovery permit, may modify the conditions of the respective permit, if he finds that modifications are necessary and will not impair existing water rights or the water quality of the aquifer.

(2)  Before any permit condition is modified, the state engineer may require notice to potentially impaired water users if he finds that the modification under consideration may impair existing water rights.



Enacted by Chapter 146, 1991 General Session

